Russian.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Ins +Pre

LEXICON Root						
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

птиц N1decl;
тыкв N1decl;
изб N1decl;
друг N2decl;
дуб N2decl;
отец N2decl;
волк N2decl;
мыш N3decl;
ноч N3decl;
сирен N3decl;

LEXICON N1decl
+N+Sg+Nom:^а #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^ы  #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^е  #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^у  #;
+N+Sg+Ins:^ой  #;
+N+Sg+Pre:^е  #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^ы  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ам  #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^ #;
+N+Pl+Ins:^ами  #;
+N+Pl+Pre:^ах  #;

LEXICON N2decl
+N+Sg+Nom:^ #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^a  #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^у  #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^а #;
+N+Sg+Ins:^ом  #;
+N+Sg+Pre:^е  #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^ы  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^ов  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ам  #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^ов #;
+N+Pl+Ins:^ами  #;
+N+Pl+Pre:^ах  #;

LEXICON N3decl
+N+Sg+Nom:^ь  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^и  #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^и  #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^ь  #;
+N+Sg+Ins:^ью  #;
+N+Sg+Pre:^и  #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^и  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^ей  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ям  #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^и  #;
+N+Pl+Ins:^ями  #;
+N+Pl+Pre:^ях  #;

END
